Delaware, session 153, SB158.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 4319, Title 10 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 4319. Confidential communications involving first responders, civilian employees, or their families. (a) For purposes of this section: (5) âCritical incident stress management team memberâ or âCISM team memberâ means an individual who satisfies all of the following: a. Is specially trained to provide CISM services to assist and provide support to a first responder who has been involved in a critical incident that may affect, or has affected, the personâs work performance or general well-being. b. Meets the requirements of a nationally-accredited critical incident stress management organization or network that has been recognized by the Police Officer Standards and Training Commission. Commission or the Commissioners of the Delaware State Fire Commission. c. Has been approved to function as a CISM team member by the Delaware State Fire Commission, or the colonel or chief of the police, fire, or emergency medical services agency of which the individual is a member. (10) âTrained peer support memberâ means a first responder designated by a state, county, or municipal law-enforcement, fire, or emergency medical services agency, with approval from the agencyâs colonel or chief, Board of Commissioners, or Executive Director of the Delaware State Fire Commission, and specially trained to provide a participant with wellness program services.